California statutes. Probate Code
(a) A proceeding may be brought under this chapter for a court order authorizing a proposed transaction, whether or not the proposed transaction is one that otherwise would require the joinder or consent of both spouses, if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) One of the spouses is alleged to lack legal capacity for the proposed transaction, whether or not that spouse has a conservator.

(2) The other spouse either has legal capacity for the proposed transaction or has a conservator.

(b) A proceeding may be brought under this chapter for a court order declaring that one or both spouses has legal capacity for a proposed transaction.

(c) One proceeding may be brought under this chapter under both subdivision (a) and subdivision (b).

(d) In a proceeding under this chapter, the court may determine whether the property that is the subject of the proposed transaction is community property or the separate property of either spouse, but such determination shall not be made in the proceeding under this chapter if the court determines that the interest of justice requires that the determination be made in a civil action.

(e) This chapter is permissive and cumulative for the transactions to which it applies.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3102.

The transactions that may be the subject of a proceeding under this chapter include, but are not limited to:

(a) Sale, conveyance, assignment, transfer, exchange, conveyance pursuant to a preexisting contract, encumbrance by security interest, deed of trust, mortgage, or otherwise, lease, including but not limited to a lease for the exploration for and production of oil, gas, minerals, or other substances, or unitization or pooling with other property for or in connection with such exploration and production.

(b) Assignment, transfer, or conveyance, in whole or in part, in compromise or settlement of an indebtedness, demand, or proceeding to which the property may be subject.

(c) Dedication or conveyance, with or without consideration, of any of the following:

(1) The property to this state or any public entity in this state, or to the United States or any agency or instrumentality of the United States, for any purpose.

(2) An easement over the property to any person for any purpose.

(d) Conveyance, release, or relinquishment to this state or any public entity in this state, with or without consideration, of any access rights to a street, highway, or freeway from the property.

(e) Consent as a lienholder to a dedication, conveyance, release, or relinquishment under subdivision (c) or (d) by the owner of property subject to the lien. 

(f) Conveyance or transfer, without consideration, to provide gifts for such purposes, and to such charities, relatives (including one of the spouses), friends, or other objects of bounty, as would be likely beneficiaries of gifts from the spouses.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Commencement of Proceeding [3110. - 3113.]

3110.

(a) A proceeding under this chapter shall be brought by a petition filed in the superior court.

(b) The proper county for commencement of the proceeding is the county in which a conservatorship proceeding of one of the spouses is pending. If a conservatorship proceeding is not pending, then in either of the following:

(1) The county in which one or both of the spouses resides.

(2) Any other county as may be in the best interests of the spouses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 806, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3111.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), any of the following persons may file, or join in, a petition under this chapter:

(1) Either spouse, whether or not the spouse has legal capacity.

(2) The conservator of either spouse.

(b) If the petition requests approval of a proposed transaction, at least one of the petitioners shall be either a conservator or a spouse having legal capacity for the transaction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3112.

(a) If a petitioning spouse is one whose legal capacity for the proposed transaction is to be determined in the proceeding, the court may do any of the following:

(1) Permit the spouse to appear without a representative.

(2) Appoint a guardian ad litem for the spouse.

(3) Take such other action as the circumstances warrant.

(b) If a petitioning spouse lacks legal capacity for the proposed transaction, the court may do either of the following:

(1) Require the spouse to be represented by the conservator of the spouse.

(2) Appoint a guardian ad litem for the spouse.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3113.

A proceeding may be brought under this chapter by the conservator of a spouse, or by a spouse having legal capacity for the proposed transaction, without the necessity of appointing a conservator for the other spouse.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Petition [3120. - 3123.]

3120.

(a) Several proposed transactions may be included in one petition and proceeding under this chapter.

(b) The petition may contain inconsistent allegations and may request relief in the alternative.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3121.

The petition shall set forth all of the following information:

(a) The name, age, and residence of each spouse.

(b) If one or both spouses is alleged to lack legal capacity for the proposed transaction, a statement that the spouse has a conservator or a statement of the facts upon which the allegation is based.

(c) If there is a conservator of a spouse, the name and address of the conservator, the county in which the conservatorship proceeding is pending, and the court number of the proceeding.

(d) If a spouse
 alleged to lack legal capacity for the proposed transaction is a patient in or on leave of absence from a state institution under the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals or the State Department of Developmental Services, the name and address of the institution.

(e) The names and addresses of all of the following persons:

(1) Relatives within the second degree of each spouse alleged to lack legal capacity for the proposed transaction.

(2) If the petition is to provide gifts or otherwise affect estate planning of the spouse who is alleged to lack capacity, as would be properly the subject of a petition under Article 10 (commencing with Section 2580) of Chapter 6 of Part 4 (substituted judgment) in the case of a conservatorship, the names and addresses of the persons identified in Section 2581.

(f) A sufficient description of the property that is the subject of the proposed transaction.

(g) An allegation that the property is community property, and, if the proposed transaction involves property in which a spouse also has a separate property interest, an allegation of good cause to include that separate property in the transaction.

(h) The estimated value of the property.

(i) The terms and conditions of the proposed transaction, including the names of all parties thereto.

(j) The relief requested.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 440, Sec. 52.   (AB 1488)   Effective September 22, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

3122.

If the proceeding is brought for a court order authorizing a proposed transaction, the petition shall set forth, in addition to the information required by Section 3121, all of the following:

(a) An allegation that one of the spouses has a conservator or facts establishing lack of legal capacity of the spouse for the proposed transaction.

(b) An allegation that the other spouse has legal capacity for the proposed transaction or has a conservator.

(c) An allegation that each spouse either: (1) joins in or consents to the proposed transaction, (2) has a conservator, or (3) is substantially unable to manage his or her financial resources or resist fraud or undue influence.

(d) Facts that may be relied upon to show that the authorization sought is for one or more of the following purposes:

(1) The advantage, benefit, or best interests of the spouses or their estates. 

(2) The care and support of either spouse or of such persons as either spouse may be legally obligated to support.

(3) The payment of taxes, interest, or other encumbrances or charges for the protection and preservation of the community property.

(4) The providing of gifts for such purposes, and to such charities, relatives (including one of the spouses), friends, or other objects of bounty, as would be likely beneficiaries of gifts from the spouses.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3123.

If the proceeding is brought for a court order declaring that one or both spouses has legal capacity for a proposed transaction, the petition shall set forth, in addition to the information required by Section 3121, an allegation of the legal capacity of such spouse or spouses for the proposed transaction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Citation and Notice of Hearing [3130. - 3131.]

3130.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), upon the filing of the petition, the clerk shall issue a citation to each nonpetitioning spouse alleged to lack legal capacity for the proposed transaction, setting forth the time and place of hearing. The citation and a copy of the petition shall be served upon the spouse at least 15 days before the hearing.

(b) Unless the court otherwise orders, if a spouse alleged to lack legal capacity for the proposed transaction has a conservator, no citation to the spouse need be issued, and the petitioner shall cause a notice of the time and place of the hearing on the petition, accompanied by a copy of the petition, to be served on the conservator at least 15 days before the hearing.

(c) Service under this section shall be made in the manner provided in Section 415.10 or 415.30 of the Code of Civil Procedure or in such other manner as may be authorized by the court. If the person to be served is outside this state, service may also be made in the manner provided in Section 415.40 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3131.

(a) At least 15 days before the hearing on the petition, the petitioner shall cause a notice of the time and place of the hearing and a copy of the petition to be served upon any nonpetitioning spouse not alleged to lack legal capacity for the proposed transaction.

(b) Service under subdivision (a) shall be made in the manner provided in Section 415.10 or 415.30 of the Code of Civil Procedure or in such other manner as may be authorized by the court. If the person to be served is outside this state, service may also be made in the manner provided in Section 415.40 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(c) At least 15 days before the hearing on the petition, the
 petitioner shall deliver pursuant to Section 1215 a notice of the time and place of the hearing on the petition to those persons required to be named in the petition at the addresses set forth in the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 57.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Hearing and Order [3140. - 3145.]

3140.

(a) A conservator served pursuant to this article shall, and the Director of State Hospitals or the Director of Developmental Services given notice pursuant to Section 1461 may, appear at the hearing and represent a spouse alleged to lack legal capacity for the proposed transaction.

(b) The court may, in its discretion and if necessary, appoint an investigator to review the proposed transaction and report to the court regarding its advisability.

(c) If the court determines that a spouse alleged to lack legal capacity has not competently retained independent counsel, the court may in its discretion appoint the public guardian, public administrator, or a guardian
 ad litem to represent the interests of the spouse.

(d) (1) If a spouse alleged to lack legal capacity is unable to retain legal counsel, upon request of the spouse, the court shall appoint the public defender or private counsel under Section 1471 to represent the spouse and, if that appointment is made, Section 1472 applies.

(2) If the petition proposes a transfer of substantial assets to the petitioner from the other spouse and the court determines that the spouse has not competently retained independent counsel for the proceeding, the court may, in its discretion, appoint counsel for the other spouse if the court determines that appointment would be helpful to resolve the matter or necessary to protect the interests of the other spouse.

(e) Except as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision
 (d), the court may fix a reasonable fee, to be paid out of the proceeds of the transaction or otherwise as the court may direct, for all services rendered by privately engaged counsel, the public guardian, public administrator, or guardian ad litem, and by counsel for such persons.

(f) The court may order the cost of the review and report by a court investigator pursuant to subdivision (b) to be paid out of the proceeds of the transaction or otherwise as the court may direct, if the court determines that its order would not cause a hardship.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 440, Sec. 53.   (AB 1488)   Effective September 22, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

3141.

(a) If a spouse is alleged to lack legal capacity for the proposed transaction and has no conservator, the spouse shall be produced at the hearing unless unable to attend the hearing.

(b) If the spouse is not able to attend the hearing because of medical inability, such inability shall be established (1) by the affidavit or certificate of a licensed medical practitioner or (2) if the spouse is an adherent of a religion whose tenets and practices call for reliance upon prayer alone for healing and is under treatment by an accredited practitioner of the religion, by the affidavit of the practitioner.

(c) Emotional or psychological instability is not good cause for absence of the spouse from the hearing unless, by reason of such instability, attendance at the hearing is likely to cause serious and immediate physiological damage.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3142.

(a) If a spouse is alleged to lack legal capacity for the proposed transaction and has no conservator, the court, before commencement of the hearing on the merits, shall inform the spouse of all of the following:

(1) A determination of lack of legal capacity for the proposed transaction may result in approval of the proposed transaction.

(2) The spouse has the right to legal counsel of the spouse’s own choosing, including the right to have legal counsel appointed by the court if unable to retain legal counsel.

(b) This section does not apply if the spouse is absent from the hearing and is not required to attend the hearing under the provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 3141 and any showing required by Section 3141 has been made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3143.

(a) If the petition requests that the court make an order declaring a spouse to have legal capacity for the proposed transaction and the court determines that the spouse has legal capacity for the proposed transaction, the court shall so order.

(b) If the petition alleges that a spouse having no conservator lacks legal capacity for the proposed transaction and the court determines that the spouse has legal capacity for the transaction, the court shall make an order so declaring.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3144.

(a) The court may authorize the proposed transaction if the court determines all of the following:

(1) The property that is the subject of the proposed transaction is community property of the spouses, and, if the proposed transaction involves property in which a spouse also has a separate property interest, that there is good cause to include that separate property in the transaction.

(2) One of the spouses then has a conservator or otherwise lacks legal capacity for the proposed transaction.

(3) The other spouse either has legal capacity for the proposed transaction or has a conservator.

(4) Each of the spouses either (i) joins in or consents to the proposed transaction, (ii) has a conservator, or (iii) is substantially unable to manage his or her own financial resources or resist fraud or undue influence. Substantial inability may not be proved by isolated incidents of negligence or improvidence.

(5) The proposed transaction is one that should be authorized under this chapter.

(b) If the proposed transaction is to provide gifts or otherwise affect estate planning of the spouse who is alleged to lack capacity, as would be properly the subject of a petition under Article 10 (commencing with Section 2580) of Chapter 6 of Part 4 (substituted judgment) in the case of a conservatorship, the court may authorize the transaction under this chapter only if the transaction is one that the court would authorize under that article.

(c) If the court determines under subdivision (a) that the transaction should be authorized, the court shall so order and may authorize the petitioner to do and perform all acts and to execute and deliver all papers, documents, and instruments necessary to effectuate the order.

(d) In an order authorizing a transaction, the court may prescribe any terms and conditions as the court in its discretion determines appropriate, including, but not limited to, requiring joinder or consent of another person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 32, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

3145.

A court determination pursuant to this chapter that a spouse lacks legal capacity for the proposed transaction affects the legal capacity of the spouse for that transaction alone and has no effect on the legal capacity of the spouse for any other purpose.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Consummation of Transaction [3150. - 3154.]

3150.

(a) Unless the court for good cause dispenses with the bond, the court shall require the petitioner to give a bond, in the amount fixed by the court, conditioned on the duty of the petitioner to account for and apply the proceeds of the transaction to be received by the petitioner only as the court may by order direct.

(b) Unless the court for good cause fixes the amount of the bond in a lesser amount, if given by an admitted surety insurer, the bond shall be in an amount not less than the value of the personal property (including cash and any notes) to be received by the petitioner, as determined by the court.

(c) If the sureties on the bond are personal sureties, the bond shall be approved by the court and shall be for twice the amount required for a bond given by an admitted surety insurer.

(d) Section 2328 is applicable to the bond of the petitioner under this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3151.

(a) The petitioner shall, upon receipt of the consideration therefor, execute, acknowledge, and deliver any necessary instruments or documents as directed by the court, setting forth therein that they are made by authority of the order.

(b) The petitioner shall cause a certified copy of the order to be recorded in the office of the recorder of each county in which is located any real property affected by the order or any real property upon which there is a lien or encumbrance affected by the order.

(c) If a sale is made upon a credit pursuant to the order, the petitioner shall take the note of the person to whom the sale is made for the amount of the unpaid balance of the purchase money, with such security for the payment thereof as the court shall by order approve. The note shall be made payable to the petitioner or, if the petition was made by a conservator, to the petitioner as conservator.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3152.

A sale, conveyance, assignment, transfer, exchange, encumbrance, security interest, mortgage, deed of trust, lease, dedication, release, or relinquishment, and any instrument or document, made pursuant to the court’s order, is as valid and effectual as if the property affected thereby were the sole and absolute property of the person making it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3153.

Notes, encumbrances, security interests, mortgages, leases, or deeds of trust, executed as provided in this chapter by a petitioning conservator create no personal liability against the conservator so executing, unless the conservator is one of the spouses and then only to the extent that personal liability would have resulted had both spouses had legal capacity for the transaction and joined in the execution.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3154.

(a) If any party to the transaction, other than the petitioner, does not consummate a transaction authorized by the court, the court, on application of the petitioner, after such notice to the parties to the transaction as the court directs, may vacate the order authorizing the transaction.

(b) If the order authorized the sale or encumbrance of property, the petitioner may by supplemental petition apply to the court for an order authorizing any other sale or encumbrance of the property to the advantage, benefit, or best interests of the spouses or their estates. The supplemental petition and a notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be served and mailed as provided in Article 4 (commencing with Section 3130) except that (1) no further citation shall be issued and (2) a copy of the supplemental petition and a notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be served upon any person who has appeared as representative of a nonpetitioning spouse or upon counsel of record for a nonpetitioning spouse or as the court may otherwise direct.

(c) If it appears to the court that the other sale or encumbrance is to the advantage, benefit, or best interests of the spouses or their estates and that the request in the supplemental petition that the transaction be authorized should be granted, the court may so order and may authorize the petitioner to do and perform acts and to execute and deliver all papers, documents, and instruments necessary to effectuate the order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 7. CAPACITY DETERMINATIONS AND HEALTH CARE DECISIONS FOR ADULT WITHOUT CONSERVATOR [3200. - 3212.]

3200.

As used in this part:

(a) “Health care” means any care, treatment, service, or procedure to maintain, diagnose, or otherwise affect a patient’s physical or mental condition.

(b) “Health care decision” means a decision regarding the patient’s health care, including the following:

(1) Selection and discharge of health care providers and institutions.

(2) Approval or disapproval of diagnostic tests, surgical procedures, programs of medication.

(3) Directions to provide, withhold, or withdraw artificial nutrition and hydration and all other forms of health care, including cardiopulmonary resuscitation.

(c) “Health care institution” means an institution, facility, or agency licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized or permitted by law to provide health care in the ordinary course of business.

(d) “Patient” means an adult who does not have a conservator of the person and for whom a health care decision needs to be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

3201.

(a) A petition may be filed to determine that a patient has the capacity to make a health care decision concerning an existing or continuing condition.

(b) A petition may be filed to determine that a patient lacks the capacity to make a health care decision concerning specified treatment for an existing or continuing condition, and further for an order authorizing a designated person to make a health care decision on behalf of the patient.

(c) One proceeding may be brought under this part under both subdivisions (a) and (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

3202.

The petition may be filed in the superior court of any of the following counties:

(a) The county in which the patient resides.

(b) The county in which the patient is temporarily living.

(c) Such other county as may be in the best interests of the patient.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3203.

A petition may be filed by any of the following:

(a) The patient.

(b) The patient’s spouse.

(c) A relative or friend of the patient, or other interested person, including the patient’s agent under a power of attorney for health care.

(d) The patient’s physician.

(e) A person acting on behalf of the health care institution in which the patient is located if the patient is in a health care institution.

(f) The public guardian or other county officer designated by the board of supervisors of the county in which the patient is located or resides or is temporarily living.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

3204.

The petition shall state, or set forth by a medical declaration attached to the petition, all of the following known to the petitioner at the time the petition is filed:

(a) The condition of the patient’s health that requires treatment.

(b) The recommended health care that is considered to be medically appropriate.

(c) The threat to the patient’s condition if authorization for the recommended health care is delayed or denied by the court.

(d) The predictable or probable outcome of the recommended health care.

(e) The medically available alternatives, if any, to the recommended health care.

(f) The efforts made to obtain consent from the patient.

(g) If the petition is filed by a person on behalf of a health care institution, the name of the person to be designated to give consent to the recommended health care on behalf of the patient.

(h) The deficit or deficits in the patient’s mental functions listed in subdivision (a) of Section 811 that are impaired, and an identification of a link between the deficit or deficits and the patient’s inability to respond knowingly and intelligently to queries about the recommended health care or inability to participate in a decision about the recommended health care by means of a rational thought process.

(i) The names and addresses, so far as they are known to the petitioner, of the persons specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1821.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

3205.

Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall determine the name of the attorney the patient has retained to represent the patient in the proceeding under this part or the name of the attorney the patient plans to retain for that purpose. If the patient has not retained an attorney and does not plan to retain one, the court shall appoint the public defender or private counsel under Section 1471 to consult with and represent the patient at the hearing on the petition and, if such appointment is made, Section 1472 applies.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3206.

(a) Not less than 15 days before the hearing, notice of the time and place of the hearing and a copy of the petition shall be personally served on the patient, the patient’s attorney, and the agent under the patient’s power of attorney for health care, if any.

(b) Not less than 15 days before the hearing, notice of the time and place of the hearing and a copy of the petition shall be delivered pursuant to Section 1215 to the following persons:

(1) The patient’s spouse, if any, at the address stated in the petition.

(2) The
 patient’s relatives named in the petition at their addresses stated in the petition.

(c) For good cause, the court may shorten or waive notice of the hearing as provided by this section. In determining the period of notice to be required, the court shall take into account both of the following:

(1) The existing medical facts and circumstances set forth in the petition or in a medical declaration attached to the petition or in a medical declaration presented to the court.

(2) The desirability, where the condition of the patient permits, of giving adequate notice to all interested persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 58.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

3207.

Notwithstanding Section 3206, the matter presented by the petition may be submitted for the determination of the court upon proper and sufficient medical declarations if the attorney for the petitioner and the attorney for the patient so stipulate and further stipulate that there remains no issue of fact to be determined.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

3208.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the court may make an order authorizing the recommended health care for the patient and designating a person to give consent to the recommended health care on behalf of the patient if the court determines from the evidence all of the following:

(1) The existing or continuing condition of the patient’s health requires the recommended health care.

(2) If untreated, there is a probability that the condition will become life-endangering or result in a serious threat to the physical or mental health of the patient.

(3) The patient is unable to consent to the recommended health care.

(b) In determining whether the patient’s mental functioning is so severely impaired that the patient lacks the capacity to make any health care decision, the court may take into consideration the frequency, severity, and duration of periods of impairment.

(c) The court may make an order authorizing withholding or withdrawing artificial nutrition and hydration and all other forms of health care and designating a person to give or withhold consent to the recommended health care on behalf of the patient if the court determines from the evidence all of the following:

(1) The recommended health care is in accordance with the patient’s best interest, taking into consideration the patient’s personal values to the extent known to the petitioner.

(2) The patient is unable to consent to the recommended health care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

3208.5.

In a proceeding under this part:

(a) Where the patient has the capacity to consent to the recommended health care, the court shall so find in its order.

(b) Where the court has determined that the patient has the capacity to consent to the recommended health care, the court shall, if requested, determine whether the patient has accepted or refused the recommended health care, and whether the patient’s consent to the recommended health care is an informed consent.

(c) Where the court finds that the patient has the capacity to consent to the recommended health care, but that the patient refuses consent, the court shall not make an order authorizing the recommended health care or designating a person to give consent to the recommended health care. If an order has been made authorizing the recommended health care and designating a person to give consent to the recommended health care, the order shall be revoked if the court determines that the patient has recovered the capacity to consent to the recommended health care. Until revoked or modified, the order is effective authorization for the recommended health care.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

3209.

The court in which the petition is filed has continuing jurisdiction to revoke or modify an order made under this part upon a petition filed, noticed, and heard in the same manner as an original petition filed under this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3210.

(a) This part is supplemental and alternative to other procedures or methods for obtaining consent to health care or making health care decisions, and is permissive and cumulative for the relief to which it applies.

(b) Nothing in this part limits the providing of health care in an emergency case in which the health care is required because (1) the health care is required for the alleviation of severe pain or (2) the patient has a medical condition that, if not immediately diagnosed and treated, will lead to serious disability or death.

(c) Nothing in this part supersedes the right that any person may have under existing law to make health care decisions on behalf of a patient, or affects the decisionmaking process of a health care institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

3211.

(a) No person may be placed in a mental health treatment facility under the provisions of this part.

(b) No experimental drug as defined in Section 111515 of the Health and Safety Code may be prescribed for or administered to any person under this part.

(c) No convulsive treatment as defined in Section 5325 of the Welfare and Institutions Code may be performed on any person under this part.

(d) No person may be sterilized under this part.

(e) The provisions of this part are subject to a valid advance health care directive under the Health Care Decisions Law, Division 4.7 (commencing with Section 4600).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

3212.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to supersede or impair the right of any individual to choose treatment by spiritual means in lieu of medical treatment, nor shall any individual choosing treatment by spiritual means, in accordance with the tenets and practices of that individual’s established religious tradition, be required to submit to medical testing of any kind pursuant to a determination of capacity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 8. OTHER PROTECTIVE PROCEEDINGS [3300. - 3803.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [3300. - 3303.]

3300.

A parent who receives any money or property belonging to a minor under any provision of this part shall account to the minor for the money or other property when the minor reaches the age of majority.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3303.

Nothing in this part limits the provisions of the California Uniform Transfers to Minors Act, Part 9 (commencing with Section 3900).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Money or Property Belonging to Minor [3400. - 3413.]



  ARTICLE 1. Total Estate Not in Excess of $5,000 [3400. - 3402.]

3400.

(a) As used in this article, “total estate of the minor” includes both the money and other property belonging to the minor and the money and other property belonging to the guardianship estate, if any, of the minor.

(b) In computing the “total estate of the minor” for the purposes of this article, all of the following shall be deducted:

(1) “Custodial property” held pursuant to the California Uniform Transfers to Minors Act, Part 9 (commencing with Section 3900).

(2) Any money or property subject to court order pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 3602 or Article 2 (commencing with Section 3610) of Chapter 4.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3401.

(a) Where a minor does not have a guardian of the estate, money or other property belonging to the minor may be paid or delivered to a parent of the minor entitled to the custody of the minor to be held in trust for the minor until the minor reaches majority if the requirements of subdivision (c) are satisfied.

(b) Where the minor has a guardian of the estate, all the money and other property belonging to the guardianship estate may be paid or delivered to a parent entitled to the custody of the minor to be held in trust for the minor until the minor reaches majority if the requirements of subdivision (c) are satisfied.

(c) This section applies only if both of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) The total estate of the minor, including the money and other property to be paid or delivered to the parent, does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) in value.

(2) The parent to whom the money or other property is to be paid or delivered gives the person making the payment or delivery written assurance, verified by the oath of such parent, that the total estate of the minor, including the money or other property to be paid or delivered to the parent, does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) in value.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3402.

The written receipt of the parent giving the written assurance under Section 3401 shall be an acquittance of the person making the payment of money or delivery of other property pursuant to this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Property in the Form of Money [3410. - 3413.]

3410.

(a) This article applies to both of the following cases:

(1) Where the minor has a guardian of the estate and the sole asset of the guardianship estate is money.

(2) Where the minor has no guardian of the estate and there is money belonging to the minor.

(b) This article does not apply to, and there shall be excluded in computing “money belonging to the minor” for the purpose of this article, all of the following:

(1) Money or property which is or will be held as “custodial property” pursuant to the California Uniform Transfers to Minors Act, Part 9 (commencing with Section 3900).

(2) Any money or property subject to court order pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 3602 or Article 2 (commencing with Section 3610) of Chapter 4.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3411.
